Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-474
988 Emergency Lifeline Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The 988 Emergency Lifeline Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of money received as a result of contracts, grants, gifts, or fees designated for the fund and transfers at the direction of the Legislature. The 988 Emergency Lifeline Cash Fund shall be used for costs of the Department of Health and Human Services related to the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline in Nebraska.

(2) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 119.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.